Idaho, session 2025, S1122.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 47-314, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-314. OIL AND GAS CONSERVATION COMMISSION CREATED -- POWERS -- LIMIT
ON LOCAL RESTRICTIONS -- ATTORNEY GENERAL. (1) There is hereby created an oil
and gas conservation commission of the state of Idaho within the department
of lands. The commission shall consist of a county commissioner as described
in this section and four (4) members appointed by the governor with the ad-
vice and consent of the senate.
(a) The county commissioner shall be from a county where oil and gas
are being produced or have been produced within the last ten (10) years
and shall be elected by a majority of the county commissioners from such
producing counties. The county commissioner shall serve a four (4) year
term. A vacancy shall be filled by election for the unexpired term in
the same manner provided for election to a full term.
(b) The governor shall appoint four (4) members who shall serve at the
pleasure of the governor. One (1) member shall be knowledgeable in oil
and gas matters and shall have a college degree in geosciences or en-
gineering and or at least five (5) years of experience in the oil and
gas industry. One (1) member shall be a mineral interest owner without
an oil and gas lease in a county where oil and gas have been produced.
One (1) member shall be a resident of Idaho knowledgeable in land use
matters and shall have at least five (5) years experience in land use
matters. The term of office of each appointed member of the commission
shall be four (4) years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment for
the unexpired term in the same manner provided for an appointment to the
full term.
(2) The commission shall annually elect a chairman and a vice chairman
from its membership. Such officers shall hold their respective offices un-
til their successors are elected. If a vacancy occurs in either office, the
commission shall elect a member to fill such office for the remainder of the
term.
(3) The commission shall meet at least annually and thereafter on dates
set by the commission. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The members of the commission appointed by the governor or selected
by the county commissioners shall be compensated as provided in section
59-509(n), Idaho Code.


(5) The oil and gas administrator of the department of lands shall be
the secretary for the commission.
(6) The department of lands shall have the power to exercise, under the
general control and supervision of the commission, all of the rights, powers
and duties vested by law in the commission, except those provided in sections
47-328 and 47-329(3), Idaho Code.
(7) The commission shall have and is hereby given jurisdiction and au-
thority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to en-
force the provisions of this act and shall have power and authority to make
and enforce rules, regulations, and orders and to do whatever may reasonably
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. Any delegation of au-
thority to any other state officer, board or commission to administer any and
all other laws of this state relating to the conservation of oil and gas is
hereby rescinded and withdrawn and such authority is hereby unqualifiedly
conferred upon the commission as herein provided. The commission shall fol-
low procedures on applications as provided in section 47-328, Idaho Code,
except as provided in sections 47-316(1)(a) and 47-329(3), Idaho Code.
(8) It is the intent of the legislature to occupy the field of the regu-
lation of oil and gas exploration and production with the limited exception
of the exercise of planning and zoning authority granted cities and counties
pursuant to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.
(9) To implement the purpose of the oil and gas conservation act, and
to advance the public interest in the orderly development of the state's oil
and gas resources, while at the same time recognizing the responsibility of
local governments to protect the public health, safety and welfare, it is
herein provided that:
(a) The commission will notify the respective city or county with ju-
risdiction upon receipt of an application and will remit, electroni-
cally, a copy of all application materials.
(b) No ordinance, resolution, requirement or standard of a city,
county or political subdivision, except a state agency with authority,
shall actually or operationally prohibit the extraction of oil and
gas; provided however, that extraction may be subject to reasonable
local ordinance provisions, not repugnant to law, that protect public
health, public safety, and public order or that prevent harm to public
infrastructure or degradation of the value, use and enjoyment of pri-
vate property. Any ordinance regulating extraction enacted pursuant
to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code, shall provide for administrative
permitting under conditions established by ordinance, not to exceed
twenty-one (21) days unless extended by agreement of the parties or upon
good cause shown.
(c) No ordinance, resolution, requirement or standard of a city, county
or political subdivision, except a state agency with authority, shall
actually or operationally prohibit construction or operation of facil-
ities and infrastructure needed for the post-extraction processing and
transport of gas and oil. However, such facilities and infrastructure
shall be subject to local ordinances, regulations and permitting re-
quirements, not repugnant to law, as provided in chapter 65, title 67,
Idaho Code.


(10) The commission may sue and be sued in its administration of this act
in any state or federal district court in the state of Idaho having jurisdic-
tion of the parties or of the subject matter.
(11) The attorney general shall act as the legal advisor of the commis-
sion and represent the commission in all court proceedings, in all proceed-
ings before the commission, and in any proceeding to which the commission may
be a party before any department of the federal government. The commission
may retain additional counsel to assist the attorney general and, for such
purpose, may employ any funds available under this act.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.